Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 59.7 COLORADO RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT FINANCE ACT OF 2009
11-59.7-107. Qualified energy conservation bond volume cap - rules.

The qualified energy conservation bond volume cap shall be administered by the Colorado energy office pursuant to this section. The Colorado energy office shall allocate the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap to the state and large local governments in accordance with federal law for the purpose of financing or refinancing projects approved by the Colorado energy office. The qualified energy conservation bond volume cap for calendar year 2009 shall be allocated by the thirtieth day following June 2, 2009. The qualified energy conservation bond volume cap for each subsequent calendar year shall be allocated on or before February 15 of the calendar year.

The state may reallocate any portion of the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap allocated or reallocated to the state pursuant to this section to any public entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing projects approved by the Colorado energy office.

Any portion of the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap for a calendar year that is allocated to a large local government pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into or for which a contract to purchase bonds or instruments evidencing interests in a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement has not been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year shall, on November 11 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the Colorado energy office. If a contract to purchase has been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year but the related bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement is not issued or entered into on or before November 30 of the calendar year, the volume cap shall automatically revert to the Colorado energy office on December 1 of the calendar year. The Colorado energy office may reallocate to any public entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project approved by the office, or carry forward pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, any volume cap that reverts to the office pursuant to this subsection (3). Any volume cap that is reallocated to a public entity pursuant to this subsection (3) that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by noon, prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of a calendar year shall, at 12:01 p.m., prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the Colorado energy office.

The Colorado energy office shall carry forward to the next calendar year any portion of the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the end of a calendar year. In selecting projects for the purpose of allocating the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap, the Colorado energy office shall prioritize projects that are ready to be financed or refinanced and that are most consistent with the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b). The Colorado energy office shall allocate the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap in a manner consistent with federal law and the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b) to minimize the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into on or before the expiration of the qualified energy conservation bond program. The Colorado energy office may allocate the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap to the state pursuant to this section in anticipation of the enactment by the general assembly of legislation authorizing a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement. The state, any large local government, or any other public entity to which the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap has been allocated pursuant to this section may, at any time, relinquish the volume cap to the Colorado energy office. Any volume cap relinquished may be reallocated by the Colorado energy office to any public entity to finance or refinance a project approved by the office or may be carried forward to the next calendar year. The department of local affairs, in consultation with the Colorado energy office, may promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 regarding the manner in which the qualified energy conservation bond volume cap will be allocated.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2204, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 956, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) and (4) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1993, § 5, effective July 1.

11-59.7-108. Recovery zone economic development bond volume cap - recovery zone facility bond volume cap - rules - report.

The recovery zone economic development bond volume cap and the recovery zone facility bond volume cap shall be administered by the commission on higher education pursuant to this section and, to the extent provided in subsection (5) of this section, the department of local affairs.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (3) to (7) of this section, the commission on higher education shall separately allocate the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap and the recovery zone facility bond volume cap to counties and large municipalities in accordance with federal law for the purpose of financing or refinancing projects that are located in recovery zones, are approved by the commission, and either are or are to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education or are expected to increase economic development in the vicinity of a facility that is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education in a manner that is complementary to the use of such higher education facility.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, any portion of the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap allocated to a county or a large municipality pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into to finance or refinance a project that is located in a recovery zone, is approved by the commission on higher education, and either is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education or is expected to increase economic development in the vicinity of a facility that is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education in a manner that is complementary to the use of such higher education facility or for which a contract to purchase bonds or instruments evidencing interests in a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement has not been entered into on or before November 10 of any calendar year shall, on November 11 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the commission. If a contract to purchase has been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year but the related bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement is not issued or entered into on or before November 30 of the calendar year, the volume cap shall automatically revert to the commission on higher education on December 1 of the calendar year. The commission on higher education may reallocate any recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap that reverts to the commission pursuant to this subsection (3) to any public entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project that is located in a recovery zone, is approved by the commission, and either is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education or is expected to increase economic development in the vicinity of a facility that is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education in a manner that is complementary to the use of such higher education facility or may carry the volume cap forward pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Any recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap that is reallocated to a public entity pursuant to this subsection (3) that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into to finance or refinance a project that is located in a recovery zone, is approved by the commission on higher education, and either is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education or is expected to increase economic development in the vicinity of a facility that is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education in a manner that is complementary to the use of such higher education facility by noon, prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of a calendar year, shall, at 12:01 p.m., prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the commission.

The commission on higher education shall carry forward to the next calendar year any portion of the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the end of a calendar year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if any portion of the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or the recovery zone facility bond volume cap, including any portion that has been carried forward pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the ninetieth day preceding the date on which the recovery zone economic development bond program or recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, is to expire under federal law, the remaining volume cap shall be allocated by the department of local affairs to public entities for the purpose of financing or refinancing any project that is located in a recovery zone and that qualifies for financing or refinancing with recovery zone economic development bonds or recovery zone facility bonds, as applicable. Any portion of any volume cap so allocated that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the fifteenth day preceding the date on which the recovery zone economic development bond program or recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, is to expire under federal law shall revert to the department of local affairs, which shall reallocate the volume cap to public entities for the purpose of financing or refinancing any project that is located in a recovery zone and that qualifies for financing or refinancing with recovery zone economic development bonds or recovery zone facility bonds, as applicable.

In selecting projects for the purpose of allocating the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap, the commission on higher education and the department of local affairs shall prioritize projects that are ready to be financed or refinanced and that are most consistent with the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b). The commission on higher education and the department of local affairs shall allocate the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap and the recovery zone facility bond volume cap in a manner consistent with federal law and the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b) to minimize the volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or one or more financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into at the expiration of the recovery zone economic development bond program or the recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, under federal law. Any county or large municipality to which the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap has been allocated pursuant to this section may, at any time, relinquish the volume cap to the commission on higher education or, in the circumstances described in subsection (5) of this section, the department of local affairs. Any volume cap relinquished may be reallocated by the commission on higher education to any public entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project that is located in a recovery zone, has been approved by the commission, and either is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education or is expected to increase economic development in the vicinity of a facility that is or is to be owned or used by one or more public institutions of higher education in a manner that is complementary to the use of such higher education facility, may be carried forward to the next calendar year, or, if the circumstances described in subsection (5) of this section apply, may be reallocated by the department of local affairs for the purpose of financing or refinancing any project that is located in a recovery zone and that qualifies for financing or refinancing with recovery zone economic development bonds or recovery zone facility bonds, as applicable. The commission on higher education and the department of local affairs may promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 regarding the manner in which the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap and the recovery zone facility bond volume cap that they are respectively responsible for allocating pursuant to this section will be allocated.

On or before the one hundred eightieth day preceding the date on which the recovery zone economic development bond program or the recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, is to expire under federal law, the commission on higher education shall deliver to the department of local affairs a written report describing:

The stimulus obligations that have been issued or entered into using the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap;

The stimulus obligations that the commission on higher education expects to be issued or entered into with the recovery zone economic development bond volume cap or recovery zone facility bond volume cap on or before the ninetieth day preceding the date on which the recovery zone economic development bond program or the recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, is to expire under federal law; and

The actions that have not yet been taken and the events that have not yet occurred but that must be taken or that must occur before the stimulus obligations described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (7) are issued or entered into, the date on which the actions and events are scheduled to be taken or to occur, and the commission's analysis of the likelihood that the actions or events will be taken or will occur and that the stimulus obligations will be issued or entered into on or before the ninetieth day preceding the date on which the recovery zone economic development bond program or the recovery zone facility bond program, as applicable, is to expire under federal law.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2205, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2021:

(3) to (6) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1994, § 6, effective July 1.

11-59.7-109. Qualified zone academy bond volume cap - rules.

The qualified zone academy bond volume cap shall be administered by the public school capital construction assistance board pursuant to this section. The qualified zone academy bond volume cap shall be allocated to school districts to finance or refinance projects approved by the public school capital construction assistance board.

Any portion of the qualified zone academy bond volume cap for a calendar year that is allocated to a school district pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into or for which a contract to purchase bonds or instruments evidencing interests in a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement has not been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year shall, on November 11 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board. If a contract to purchase has been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year but the related bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement is not issued or entered into on or before November 30 of the calendar year, the volume cap shall automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board on December 1 of the calendar year. The public school capital construction assistance board may reallocate to any school district for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project approved by the board any volume cap that reverts to the board pursuant to this subsection (2) or may carry the volume cap forward pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Any volume cap that is reallocated to a school district pursuant to this subsection (2) that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by noon, prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of a calendar year shall, at 12:01 p.m., prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board.

The public school capital construction assistance board shall carry forward to the next calendar year any portion of the qualified zone academy bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the end of a calendar year.

In selecting projects for the purpose of allocating the qualified zone academy bond volume cap, the public school capital construction assistance board shall prioritize projects that are ready to be financed or refinanced and that are most consistent with the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b). The public school capital construction assistance board shall allocate the qualified zone academy bond volume cap in a manner consistent with federal law and the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b) to minimize the qualified zone academy bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into by the expiration of the qualified zone academy bond program. Any school district to which the qualified zone academy bond volume cap has been allocated pursuant to this section may, at any time, relinquish the volume cap to the public school capital construction assistance board. Any volume cap relinquished may be reallocated by the public school capital construction assistance board to a school district to finance or refinance a project approved by the board or may be carried forward to the next calendar year. The public school capital construction assistance board may promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 regarding the manner in which the qualified zone academy bond volume cap will be allocated.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2208, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2021:

(2) to (4) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1996, § 7, effective July 1.

11-59.7-110. Recovery and reinvestment act finance authorities.

Two or more public entities that are authorized to issue or enter into one or more types of stimulus obligations or one or more public entities that are authorized to issue or enter into one or more types of stimulus obligations and one or more public entities that may use or benefit from the project or projects to be financed or refinanced by one or more types of stimulus obligations may, by or pursuant to one or more contracts with each other, create a separate legal entity, to be known as a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority, for the purposes of issuing or entering into stimulus obligations of the type or types, providing for the use or distribution of the proceeds of the stimulus obligations, providing for the payment of the stimulus obligations, and addressing other matters relating to the stimulus obligations and the property and operations of the recovery and reinvestment act finance authority.

The contract pursuant to which a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority is created shall specify:

The name and purpose of the authority and the type or types of stimulus obligations that the authority is authorized to issue or enter into;

The establishment and organization of the governing body of the authority, which shall be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the authority is vested, including:

The number of directors, their manner of appointment, their terms of office, their compensation, if any, and the procedure for filling vacancies on the board;

The officers of the authority, the manner of their selection, and their duties;

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless otherwise specifically provided, a majority of directors shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the quorum shall be necessary for any action taken by the board; and

The duties of the board;

The obligations and rights of the contracting public entities;

Provisions for the disposition, division, or distribution of any property of the authority;

The term of the contract creating the authority, which may be continued for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated, and the method, if any, by which it may be rescinded or terminated; except that the contract may not be rescinded or terminated so long as the authority has bonds or one or more financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements outstanding unless provision for full payment of the bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement or agreements, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement or agreements;

The provisions for the amendment of the contract creating the authority;

Any intention of the contracting public entities to create the authority as, and have the authority conduct its business in a manner that satisfies all requirements of the constitution and laws of the state for maintaining the status of, an enterprise, as defined in section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution; and

The conditions required when adding or deleting public entities to or from the contract.

The general powers of a recovery and reinvestment finance authority shall include the following powers:

To issue or enter into bonds and financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements that qualify as the type or types of stimulus obligations identified in the contract;

To use or distribute the proceeds of its stimulus obligations for the benefit of one or more of the contracting public entities;

To make and enter into ancillary agreements and other contracts and agreements with the contracting public entities and other persons;

To employ agents and employees, to enter into contracts with attorneys, accountants, investment bankers, and other consultants, and to do and perform any acts and things authorized by this section under, through, or by means of any employee, agent, or person with which it contracts;

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To adopt, by resolution, bylaws, rules, and regulations respecting the exercise of its powers and the carrying out of its purposes;

To deposit moneys not then needed in the conduct of its affairs in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making deposits, the board of directors of the authority may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys. The persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board of directors requires.

To exercise any other powers that are necessary or convenient to the exercise of its other powers.

A recovery and reinvestment act finance authority shall be a political subdivision and a public corporation of the state, separate from the parties to the contract creating the authority, and shall be a validly created and existing political subdivision and public corporation of the state irrespective of whether a public entity withdraws, whether voluntarily, by operation of law, or otherwise, from the authority subsequent to its creation under circumstances not resulting in the rescission or termination of the contract pursuant to the terms of the contract. A recovery and reinvestment act finance authority shall have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate.

The income or other revenues of a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority and all property at any time owned by an authority shall be exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state.

The contracting public entities may provide in the contract creating a recovery and reinvestment act financing authority for payment to the authority of money from any legally available source to be used for payment of the bonds, financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements, and contractual and other obligations and liabilities of the authority.

To carry out the purposes for which a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority was created, the authority may issue bonds and enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements payable solely from amounts paid to the authority from the contracting public entities, amounts paid to the authority by other persons, and any other available money of the authority. The terms, conditions, and details of the bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements and the procedures related thereto shall be set forth in the stimulus obligation documents authorizing the bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements. The terms, conditions, and details of the bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements shall, as nearly as may be practicable and subject to the provisions of sections 11-59.7-104 and 11-59.7-105, be substantially the same as those provided in part 6 of article 4 of title 43 relating to regional transportation authorities. Bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements issued or entered into under this subsection (7) shall not constitute a debt of a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority or a debt or multiple-fiscal year financial obligation of the state or any of the contracting public entities within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or provisions. Each bond or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement issued or entered into under this subsection (7) shall recite in substance that the bond or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues and other available funds of the recovery and reinvestment act finance authority pledged for the payment thereof and that the bond or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement does not constitute a debt of the authority or a debt or multiple-fiscal year financial obligation of the state or any of the contracting public entities within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or provisions.

The stimulus obligation documents under which bonds are issued or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements are entered into pursuant to subsection (7)(a) of this section shall constitute a contract with the holders thereof and may contain such provisions as are determined by the board of the recovery and reinvestment act finance authority to be appropriate and necessary in connection therewith and to provide security for the payment thereof, including, without limitation, any mortgage or other security interest in any revenues, funds, rights, or properties of the authority.

The powers granted to a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority pursuant to this section are supplemental to and shall in no manner limit the powers of public entities to enter into intergovernmental agreements or contracts or to establish separate legal entities pursuant to any other provision of law.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2209, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(e), (3)(a), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1997, § 8, effective July 1.

11-59.7-111. Reporting requirements.

A public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation authorized by the allocation or reallocation of the volume cap to the public entity pursuant to section 11-59.7-106, 11-59.7-107, 11-59.7-108, or 11-59.7-109, by the public school capital construction assistance board, the Colorado energy office, the commission on higher education, or the department of local affairs, as applicable, shall deliver a report to the entity that allocated or reallocated the volume cap within thirty days after the stimulus obligation is issued or entered into. The report shall include the following information and any other information requested by the entity that allocated or reallocated the volume cap:

The type of stimulus obligation;

The state law or laws under which the stimulus obligation was issued or entered into;

The date on which the stimulus obligation was issued or entered into;

A description of the project financed or refinanced with the proceeds of the stimulus obligation;

The principal amount, interest rates or method for determining the interest rates, and maturity dates for the stimulus obligation and a schedule showing all scheduled payments on the stimulus obligation;

The person or persons to which the stimulus obligation was sold;

The terms on which the stimulus obligation was sold, including but not limited to any premium or discount at which the stimulus obligation was sold and any redemption or tender provisions applicable to the stimulus obligation;

A description of any credit or liquidity enhancement or credit or liquidity support for the stimulus obligation and the amounts paid or to be paid for the enhancement or support;

A description of any interest rate exchange agreement, interest rate cap agreement, or other similar agreement entered into in connection with the stimulus obligation;

A copy of form 8038, 8038G, or other similar form that is filed with the federal internal revenue service in connection with the stimulus obligation; and

A copy of the official statement, offering document, or other similar document prepared in connection with the sale of the stimulus obligation.

The failure of a public entity to comply with subsection (1) of this section shall not adversely affect the validity of the stimulus obligation issued or entered into, but no public entity that has failed to comply with said subsection (1) with respect to a stimulus obligation shall be authorized to issue or enter into any other stimulus obligation until the entity that allocated or reallocated to the public entity the volume cap that authorized the public entity to issue or enter into the stimulus obligation has certified in writing that the public entity is in compliance with said subsection (1).

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2213, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 958, § 3, effective July 1.

11-59.7-112. No limitation on powers.

The powers conferred by this article are in addition to and supplemental to and not in substitution for the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing in this article shall be interpreted to limit the powers of any public entity under any other law. If any provision of this article is inconsistent with any provision of any other law, the provisions of this article shall control.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2214, § 1, effective June 2.

11-59.7-113. Executive orders authorized.

This article was enacted in order to authorize public entities to take full advantage of financing opportunities available under the federal recovery and reinvestment act shortly after the enactment of the act and without detailed guidance from the executive branch of the federal government or courts regarding the proper interpretation of the act. If, based on additional information regarding the proper interpretation of the federal recovery and reinvestment act or amendments to the act, the governor determines that any provision of this article is not authorized by or is inconsistent with federal law or regulations or that additional legal authority is needed to authorize public entities to take full advantage of financing opportunities available under the act, the governor is expressly authorized to issue one or more executive orders that stops the operation or implementation of the unauthorized or inconsistent provision or provides the necessary additional legal authority.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2214, § 1, effective June 2.

11-59.7-113.5. Specified tax credit bonds.

A public entity may elect pursuant to the internal revenue code to treat any stimulus obligation as a specified tax credit bond. Any volume cap allocated to a public entity for stimulus obligations of the same type as a stimulus obligation for which such an election has been made shall apply to the stimulus obligation.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-200), ch. 234, p. 1028, § 3, effective May 18.

11-59.7-114. Applicability.

This article shall apply only to stimulus obligations issued or entered into pursuant to the federal recovery and reinvestment act on or before the date the authority to issue or enter into stimulus obligations of such type expires under the federal recovery and reinvestment act.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2214, § 1, effective June 2.